Massachusetts, session 194th, H4267.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 43 of the acts of 2007 or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, the city of Boston police department shall waive the maximum age 
requirement for original appointment of police officers for Constantinos Papadopoulos. If 
Constantinos Papadopoulos meets all other requirements set forth by the Boston police 
department, he shall be eligible to have his name certified for original appointment to the 
position of police officer. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.